Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska49-14,103.04
Violations; penalties.

(1) Any officer who knowingly violates sections 49-14,103.01 to 49-14,103.03 shall be guilty of a Class III misdemeanor.

(2) Any officer who negligently violates sections 49-14,103.01 to 49-14,103.03 shall be guilty of a Class V misdemeanor.

Laws 1986, LB 548, § 5;

Laws 2005, LB 242, § 51.